Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Adjudication

§ 43-21-551.
Scheduling of adjudicatory hearings.

Unless the hearing is continued upon a showing of good cause or the person who is a subject to the cause has admitted the allegations of the petition, an adjudicatory hearing shall be held within ninety (90) days after the filing of the petition to determine whether there is legally sufficient evidence to find that the child is a delinquent child, a child in need of supervision, a neglected child or an abused child. If the adjudicatory hearing is not held within the ninety (90) days, the petition shall be dismissed with prejudice.

If the child is in detention, the hearing shall be held as soon as possible but not later than twenty-one (21) days after the child is first detained by the youth court unless the hearing be postponed:

upon motion of the child;

where process cannot be completed; or

upon a judicial finding that a material witness is not presently available. If the adjudicatory hearing is not held or postponed for the aforesaid reasons, the child may be released from detention.

If the child is held in shelter, the hearing shall be held as soon as possible but not later than thirty (30) days after the child is first taken into custody unless the hearing is postponed:

upon motion of the child;

where process cannot be completed; or

upon a judicial finding that a material witness is not presently available. If the adjudicatory hearing is not held or postponed for the aforesaid reasons, the child may be released from shelter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 58; Laws, 1980, ch. 550, § 21, eff from and after July 1, 1980.

§ 43-21-553.
Uncontested adjudications.

At any time after the petition has been filed, all parties to the cause may appear before the judge and admit the allegations of the petition. The judge may accept this admission as proof of the allegations if the judge finds that:

the parties making the admission fully understand their rights and fully understand the potential consequences of their admission to the allegations;

the parties making the admission voluntarily, intelligently and knowingly admit to all facts necessary to constitute a basis for court action under this chapter;

the parties making the admission have not in the reported admission to the allegation set forth facts that, if found to be true, constitute a defense to the allegation; and

the child making the admission is effectively represented by counsel.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 59, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§ 43-21-555.
Plea bargaining prohibited.

Under no circumstances shall the party or the prosecutor engage in discussion for the purpose of agreeing to exchange concessions by the prosecutor for the party’s admission to the petition.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 60, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§ 43-21-557.
Order of proceedings.

At the beginning of each adjudicatory hearing, the youth court shall:

verify the name, age and residence of the child who is the subject of the cause and ascertain the relationship of the parties, each to the other;

ascertain whether all necessary parties are present and identify all persons participating in the hearing;

ascertain whether the notice requirements have been complied with and, if not, whether the affected parties intelligently waived compliance in accordance with Section 43-21-507;

explain to the parties the purpose of the hearing and the possible dispositional alternatives thereof; and

explain to the parties:

the right to counsel;

the right to remain silent;

the right to subpoena witnesses;

the right to cross-examine witnesses testifying against him; and

the right to appeal.

The youth court should then ascertain whether the parties before the youth court are represented by counsel. If a party before the youth court is not represented by counsel, the youth court shall ascertain whether the party understands his right to counsel. If the party wishes to retain counsel, the youth court shall continue the hearing for a reasonable time to allow the party to obtain and consult with counsel of his choosing. If an indigent child does not have counsel, the youth court shall appoint counsel to represent the child and shall continue the hearing for a reasonable time to allow the child to consult with his appointed counsel.

The youth court may then inquire whether the parties admit or deny the allegations in the petition as provided in Section 43-21-553.

The youth court may at any time terminate the proceedings and dismiss the petition if the youth court finds such action to be conducive to the welfare of the child and in the best interest of the state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 61, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§ 43-21-559.
Evidence admissible.

In arriving at its adjudicatory decision, the youth court shall consider only evidence which has been formally admitted at the adjudicatory hearing. All testimony shall be under oath and may be in narrative form. In proceedings to determine whether a child is a delinquent child or a child in need of supervision, the youth court shall admit any evidence that would be admissible in a criminal proceeding. In proceedings to determine whether a child is a neglected child or an abused child, the youth court shall admit any evidence that would be admissible in a civil proceeding.

An out-of-court admission by the child, even if otherwise admissible, shall be insufficient to support an adjudication that the child is a delinquent child unless the admission is corroborated, in whole or in part, by other competent evidence.

Members of the youth court staff may appear as witnesses except that no member of the youth court staff may testify as to an admission or confession made to him.

No statements, admissions or confessions made by or incriminatory information obtained from a child in the course of a screening or assessment that is undertaken in conjunction with any proceedings under this chapter, including, but not limited to, that which is court-ordered, shall be admitted into evidence against the child on the issue of whether the child committed a delinquent act under this chapter or on the issue of guilt in any criminal proceedings.

The provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection are in addition to and do not override any existing statutory and constitutional prohibition on the admission into evidence in delinquency and criminal proceedings of information obtained during screening, assessment or treatment.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 62; Laws, 2016, ch. 438, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 43-21-561.
Adjudication of status, standard of proof, and findings.

If the youth court finds on proof beyond a reasonable doubt that a child is a delinquent child or a child in need of supervision, the youth court shall enter an order adjudicating the child to be a delinquent child or a child in need of supervision.

Where the petition alleges that the child is a delinquent child, the youth court may enter an order that the child is a child in need of supervision on proof beyond a reasonable doubt that the child is a child in need of supervision.

If the court finds from a preponderance of the evidence that the child is a neglected child, an abused child, a dependent child or a child in need of special care the youth court shall enter an order adjudicating the child to be a neglected child, an abused child, dependent child or a child in need of special care.

No decree or order of adjudication concerning any child shall recite that a child has been found guilty; but it shall recite that a child is found to be a delinquent child or a child in need of supervision or a neglected child or an abused child or a sexually abused child or a dependent child or a child in need of special care. Upon a written motion by a party, the youth court shall make written findings of fact and conclusions of law upon which it relies for the adjudication that the child is a delinquent child, a child in need of supervision, a neglected child, an abused child, a dependent child or a child in need of special care.

No adjudication upon the status of any child shall operate to impose any of the civil disabilities ordinarily imposed on an adult because of a criminal conviction, nor shall any child be deemed a criminal by reason of adjudication, nor shall that adjudication be deemed a conviction. A person in whose interest proceedings have been brought in the youth court may deny, without any penalty, the existence of those proceedings and any adjudication made in those proceedings. Except for the right of a defendant or prosecutor in criminal proceedings and a respondent or a youth court prosecutor in youth court proceedings to cross-examine a witness, including a defendant or respondent, to show bias or interest, no adjudication shall be used for impeachment purposes in any court.

No statements, admissions or confessions made by or incriminatory information obtained from a child in the course of a screening or assessment that is undertaken in conjunction with any proceedings under this chapter, including, but not limited to, that which is court-ordered, shall be admitted into evidence against the child on the issue of whether the child committed a delinquent act under this chapter or on the issue of guilt in any criminal proceedings.

The provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection are in addition to and do not override any existing statutory and constitutional prohibition on the admission into evidence in delinquency and criminal proceedings of information obtained during screening, assessment or treatment.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 63; Laws, 1980, ch. 550, § 22; Laws, 2002, ch. 410, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 349, § 2; Laws, 2016, ch. 438, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 2016.